test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s73_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - læa: # 
    læa+V+Inf: læa
    læa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: læar
    læa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: læaði
    læa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: læaðu
    læa+V+Sup: læað
    læa+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: læaður
